tsez.twol
Alphabet
	а а̄ ӓ б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш ы ь э
	ю я ӏ ъ ʼ

	%{б%}:б %{р%}:р %{й%}:й
	%{б%}:0 %{р%}:0 %{й%}:0

	%{ALLAT.а%}:а̄ %{ALLAT.г%}:г %{ALLAT.ъ%}:ъ %{ALLAT.о%}:о %{ALLAT.р%}:р
	%{АLLAT.а%}:0 %{ALLAT.г%}:0 %{ALLAT.ъ%}:0 %{ALLAT.о%}:0
	                            %{ALLAT.ъ%}:х
	
	%>

;

Diacritics
	%{WeakVowel%};

Sets
	ALLAT = %{ALLAT.а%} %{ALLAT.г%} %{ALLAT.ъ%} %{ALLAT.о%} %{ALLAT.р%} ;
	Vowels = а а̄ ӓ е ё и о у ы э ю я ;
	Consonants = б г д ж з к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш ;
	! й

	Letters = а а̄ ӓ е ё и о у ы э ю я б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с
	т ф х ц ч ш ӏ ъ ь ;

	Modifier = й ӏ ʼ;

	NonVowels = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш ӏ ъ ь ;

	Agreement = %{б%} %{р%} %{й%} ;

Definitions

!MorphemeBoundary = [ [ Vowels:0 ]* %>: [ Vowels:0 ]* ];
MorphemeBoundary = [  %>: :0*  ];
C = :Consonants [ :Modifier | :ъ | :ь ]*;

Rules

"drop V in V>V2 or CV#"
V:0 <=> _ :0* MorphemeBoundary+ [ Vowels:Vowels | ALLAT:Vowels ] ;
	:Vowels :Modifier* :0* MorphemeBoundary+ :NonVowels+ %{WeakVowel%} _ :0* MorphemeBoundary* .#. ;
	Vowels:Vowels :0* MorphemeBoundary+ %{WeakVowel%} _ ;
	where V in Vowels;


"insert vowel when two consonants straddle a morpheme boundary"
0:е <=> C :0* MorphemeBoundary* _ C :0* MorphemeBoundary* .#. ;
	C :0* MorphemeBoundary* _ :0* MorphemeBoundary* C :0* MorphemeBoundary* C ;

"drop morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"ALLAT а disappearance"
%{ALLAT.а%}:0 <=> :л : %>: _ %{ALLAT.г%}: %{ALLAT.ъ%}: %{ALLAT.о%}: %{ALLAT.р%}: ;

"ALLAT г disappearance"
%{ALLAT.г%}:0 <= :л : %>: %{ALLAT.а%}:0 _ ;

"ALLAT ъ:х"
%{ALLAT.ъ%}:х <=> :л : %>: %{ALLAT.а%}:0 %{ALLAT.г%}:0 _ ;

"ALLAT о disappearance"
%{ALLAT.о%}:0 <=> %>: %{ALLAT.а%}: %{ALLAT.г%}:0 %{ALLAT.ъ%}:0 _ ;

"ALLAT р ending avoidance"
s:0 /<= %>: Vowels: %>: %{ALLAT.а%}:а̄ ALLAT:* _ ;
	where s in ALLAT;

"prefix agreement"
A:0 <=> _ %>: [ Consonants: | й ]; where A in Agreement ;
